Utah statutes.
59-1-1506.   Severability clause.

If any provision of this part or the application of any provision to any person or circumstance is held invalid by a final decision of a court of competent jurisdiction, the remainder of this part shall be given effect without the invalid provision or application.  The provisions of this part are severable.

